Georgia, session 2025_26, HB217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
13 SECTION 1.
14 Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended in
15 Code Section 20-2-51, relating to election of local board of education members, persons
H. B. 217
- 1 -

25 HB 217/AP
16 ineligible to be members of superintendent, ineligibility for local boards of education, and
17 ineligibility for other elective offices, by revising subparagraph (c)(4)(B) as follows:
18 "(B) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of Code Section 20-2-244, in local school systems
19 in which the initial fall current enrollment count conducted in 2009 pursuant to Code
20 Section 20-2-160 does not exceed a full-time equivalent count of 2,800, the State Board
21 of Education shall be authorized to waive this paragraph upon the request of a local
22 board of education or an individual attempting to qualify to run for local board of
23 education member and in accordance with the provisions of subsections (d) and (e) of
24 Code Section 20-2-244; provided, however, that prior to submitting any such request,
25 the local board of education shall, upon its own initiative, or at the request of such
26 individual attempting to qualify to run for local board of education member:
27 (i) Provide 30 days' notice of the individual's intent to run for office; and
28 (ii) Conduct a public hearing for the purpose of providing an opportunity for full
29 discussion and public input on the issue of potential nepotism problems and other
30 concerns with regard to such waiver. The public hearing shall be advertised at least
31 seven days prior to the date of such hearing in a local newspaper of general
32 circulation which shall be the same newspaper in which other legal announcements
33 of the local board of education are advertised. The public hearing may be conducted
34 in conjunction with a regular or called meeting of the local board or may be
35 conducted independently, at the local board's discretion.
36 The cost of such notice and public hearing shall be borne by the local board. The State
37 Board of Education shall approve or deny a waiver request no later than 45 days after
38 receipt of such waiver request, taking into consideration whether the benefit to the
39 public would justify approval of the waiver. An approved waiver must be received by
40 the local election superintendent prior to an individual's filing of a declaration or notice
41 of candidacy in accordance with Article 4 of Chapter 2 of Title 21."
H. B. 217
- 2 -

25 HB 217/AP
42 SECTION 2.
43 Said title is further amended in Code Section 20-2B-5, relating to powers of the education
44 savings authority, by revising subsection (b) and by adding a new subsection to read as
45 follows:
46 "(b) Pursuant Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, pursuant to Code
47 Section 50-18-70, the education savings authority shall not disclose and shall keep
48 confidential, in each case unless identifying information has been redacted:
49 (1) Records that include information identifying a student or former student by name,
50 address except for ZIP Code, telephone number, or emergency contact; and
51 (2) Records that reveal an individual's social security number, mother's birth name, credit
52 card information, debit card information, bank account information, account number,
53 utility account number, password used to access his or her account, financial data or
54 information, insurance or medical information in all records, unlisted telephone number
55 if so designated in a public record, personal email address or cellular telephone number,
56 or month and day of birth."
57 "(d) As necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the education savings authority
58 or its duly authorized agents may submit to the state revenue commissioner the names of
59 applicants for promise scholarship accounts or account funds or other benefits or payments
60 provided under this chapter, as well as the relevant income threshold specified therein. If
61 the education savings authority elects to contract with the state revenue commissioner for
62 such purposes, the state revenue commissioner and his or her agents or employees shall
63 notify the education savings authority whether each submitted applicant's income exceeds
64 the relevant income threshold provided. The education savings authority shall pay the state
65 revenue commissioner for all costs incurred by the Department of Revenue pursuant to this
66 subsection. No information shall be provided by the Department of Revenue to the
67 education savings authority without an executed cooperative agreement between the two
68 entities. Any tax information secured from the federal government by the Department of
H. B. 217
- 3 -

25 HB 217/AP
69 Revenue pursuant to express provisions of Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code may
70 not be disclosed by the Department of Revenue pursuant to this subsection. Any person
71 receiving any tax information under the authority of this subsection is subject to the
72 provisions of Code Section 48-7-60 and to all penalties provided under Code Section
73 48-7-61 for unlawful divulging of confidential tax information."
74 SECTION 3.
75 Said title is further amended in Chapter 4, relating to vocational, technical, and adult
76 education, by revising Article 6, relating to the Dual Achievement Program, as follows:
77 "ARTICLE 6
78 20-4-140.
79 As used in this article, the term:
80 (1) 'Dual Achievement Program' or 'program' means the program provided for in this
81 article.
82 (2) 'Eligible student' means a student who meets the qualifications to participate in the
83 program.
84 (3) 'Extracurricular activities' and 'interscholastic activities' shall have the same
85 respective meanings as set forth in Code Section 20-2-319.6.
86 (4) 'QBE formula earnings' means funds earned for the Quality Basic Education Formula
87 pursuant to Code Section 20-2-161 and shall include the portion of such funds that are
88 calculated as the local five mill share in accordance with Code Section 20-2-164. QBE
89 formula earnings shall include the salary portion of direct instructional costs, the
90 adjustment for training and experience, the nonsalary portion of direct instructional costs,
91 and earnings for psychologists and school social workers, school administration, facility
92 maintenance and operation, media centers, and staff development, as determined by the
93 Department of Education.
94 (3)(5) 'State board' means the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia.
H. B. 217
- 4 -

25 HB 217/AP
95 (6) 'Resident school' means the public school in which an eligible student is or would be
96 enrolled based on his or her primary residence.
97 (7) 'Resident school system' means the public school system in which an eligible student
98 is or would be enrolled based on his or her primary residence.
99 (4)(8) 'Technical college system' means the Technical College System of Georgia.
100 20-4-141.
101 (a)(1) The state board shall, in coordination with the State Board of Education,
102 Department of Education, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of
103 Corrections, and the Office of Planning and Budget, establish a pilot program to allow
104 students who meet eligibility requirements to qualify for enrollment in the Dual
105 Achievement Program at a participating unit of the technical college system and, upon
106 successful completion of the program, be awarded a high school diploma. The purpose
107 of the pilot program is to assess the feasibility of implementing a state-funded program
108 for eligible students who have withdrawn from high school to enroll in a unit of the
109 technical college system to participate in an academic and technical education and
110 training program which, upon successful completion, allows the student to earn a high
111 school diploma while also earning a technical college associate degree, a technical
112 college diploma, or technical college certificates of credit in specific career pathways.
113 (2) To implement the pilot program, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
114 contrary, the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia state board and the
115 State Board of Education shall be authorized to waive or provide variances to state rules,
116 regulations, policies, and procedures and to provisions of this title that may be reasonably
117 necessary to meet the goals of the pilot program, including, but not limited to, such rules,
118 regulations, policies, procedures, and provisions as relate to the calculation, allocation,
119 and distribution of QBE formula earnings. Such waivers or variances shall automatically
120 expire at the end of five ten years unless an earlier expiration is provided for. The State
H. B. 217
- 5 -

25 HB 217/AP
121 Board of the Technical College System of Georgia state board and the State Board of
122 Education shall be authorized to seek waivers or variances of federal laws, rules,
123 regulations, policies, and procedures that may be reasonably necessary to meet the goals
124 of the pilot program.
125 (3) The pilot program, as determined by the state board, may include up to five units of
126 the technical college system for a period of five ten years. In an effort to pilot the
127 program under various conditions present in the state, the state board shall seek to include
128 in the pilot program units of the technical college system from various geographic areas
129 in the state.
130 (4) The state board shall review the results of the pilot program and shall no later than
131 February 1 November 15 each year during the program provide the General Assembly
132 the Office and Planning and Budget and the chairpersons of the House Committee on
133 Education, the Senate Education and Youth Committee, the House Committee on Higher
134 Education, the Senate Higher Education Committee, the House Committee on
135 Appropriations, and the Senate Appropriations Committee with a comprehensive report
136 on the program with any recommendations for its continued use and any needed changes
137 in the program. Such report shall include a comprehensive list of any such waivers or
138 variances implemented or requested as provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection,
139 a statement of necessity for each waiver or variance, and with respect to any such
140 requests, request, and whether each request was granted in whole or in part.
141 (b) The pilot program established by the state board pursuant to this article shall provide
142 for the award of a high school diploma by the state board to students who successfully
143 complete the program.
144 (c) The state board shall determine the specific competencies concerning the skills and
145 knowledge needed for completion of each component of the program; provided, however,
146 that the state board shall make such determination regarding the skills and knowledge
H. B. 217
- 6 -

25 HB 217/AP
147 needed to meet the requirements for a high school diploma as provided for in this program
148 in consultation with the State Board of Education and the Department of Education.
149 (d) In order to minimize the risk of prospective students prematurely withdrawing from
150 a secondary school in order to participate in the program, the The state board shall provide
151 for preliminary review of academic records, including, but not limited to official secondary
152 school transcripts, submitted by prospective students to determine whether such students
153 meet the requirements provided for in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (e) of this Code
154 Section section. If a prospective student meets such requirements, the student shall be so
155 notified and allowed to complete a readiness assessment required by the technical college
156 system. Students who meet the requirements provided for in paragraphs (1) and (2) of
157 subsection (e) of this Code Section section and attain a an acceptable score of admission
158 acceptable on the readiness assessment shall be notified that they are eligible to participate
159 in the program, subject to meeting the requirements provided for in the applicable
160 paragraphs (4) and (5) of subsection (e) (f) of this Code Section section.
161 (e) To be eligible to participate in the program, a student shall:
162 (1) Be 16 years of age or older;
163 (2) Have completed at least six of the nine following state required ninth and tenth grade
164 level high school courses: two English courses, two mathematics courses, two science
165 courses, two social studies courses, and one health and physical education course; and
166 any state required tests associated with any such courses;
167 (3) Receive a an acceptable score of admission acceptable on the readiness assessment
168 required by the technical college system; and
169 (4) Meet the requirements provided for in the applicable paragraph of subsection (f) of
170 this Code section.
171 (f)(1) Before July 1, 2026, to be eligible to participate in the program, a student shall be
172 withdrawn from a public secondary school of this state, shall meet the requirements
H. B. 217
- 7 -

25 HB 217/AP
173 provided for in subsection (e) of this Code section, and shall provide Provide the
174 following:
175 (A) If an unemancipated minor:
176 (i) Verification that the student's parent or legal guardian attended a conference with
177 the student's high school principal or the principal's designee as provided for in
178 subsection (e) of Code Section 20-2-690.1;
179 (ii) A copy of the form provided for in subsection (e) of Code Section 20-2-690.1
180 signed by the student's parent or legal guardian;
181 (iii) Written acknowledgment by the student's parent or guardian that withdrawal of
182 the student from secondary school may result in loss of eligibility for
183 accommodations, specialized instruction, and other services pursuant to the federal
184 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.A. U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq.,
185 and Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.A. U.S.C. Section
186 701, et seq.; and
187 (iv) Written acknowledgment that the high school diploma available through the Dual
188 Achievement Program requires successful completion of the program; or
189 (B) If an emancipated minor or a student who is 18, 19, or 20 years of age:
190 (i) Written acknowledgment that the student has conferred with his or her secondary
191 school principal or the principal's designee or a qualified designated official of the
192 technical college system and discussed alternatives to withdrawing from high school
193 without completing graduation requirements and potential consequences of not having
194 a high school diploma, including lower lifetime earnings, fewer jobs for which the
195 student will be qualified, and the inability to avail oneself of higher educational
196 opportunities;
197 (ii) Written acknowledgment by the student's parent or guardian that withdrawal of
198 the student from secondary school may result in loss of eligibility for
199 accommodations, specialized instruction, and other services pursuant to the federal
H. B. 217
- 8 -

25 HB 217/AP
200 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.A. U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq.,
201 and Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.A. U.S.C. Section
202 701, et seq.; and
203 (iii) Written acknowledgment that the high school diploma available through the
204 Dual Achievement Program requires successful completion of the program; and.
205 (5) Be withdrawn from a public secondary school of this state.
206 (2) Beginning July 1, 2026, to be eligible to participate in the program, a student shall
207 be enrolled in a public secondary school of this state, shall not have reached 21 years of
208 age, shall meet the requirements provided for in subsection (e) of this Code section, and
209 shall provide the following:
210 (A) Written acknowledgment that such student shall not be eligible to participate in
211 extracurricular activities or interscholastic activities under the sponsorship, direction,
212 or control of such student's resident school or resident school system; and
213 (B) Written acknowledgment that the high school diploma available through the Dual
214 Achievement Program requires successful completion of the program.
215 (g) Any student who is enrolled in the program on June 30, 2026, shall remain eligible to
216 participate in the program according to the terms and conditions of such student's original
217 eligibility to participate in the program.
218 (h) By March 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall adopt any policies, rules, or
219 regulations that are necessary to ensure that any student who withdraws from his or her
220 resident school or resident school system and subsequently wishes to participate in the
221 program shall be permitted to re-enroll in such resident school or resident school system
222 in order to participate in the program on and after July 1, 2026. Such policies, rules, and
223 regulations shall provide for such students to complete such re-enrollment without having
224 to appear at such resident school or resident school system. Upon collaboration with the
225 state board, such policies, rules, and regulations may provide for such re-enrollment to be
226 facilitated by the technical college system.
H. B. 217
- 9 -

25 HB 217/AP
227 (f)(i) The state board shall award a high school diploma to a student enrolled in the
228 program provided for in this article who:
229 (1) Completes all student counseling and assessment requirements of the program;
230 (2) Completes rigorous coursework at a participating unit of the technical college
231 system; and
232 (3) Completes:
233 (A) A technical college associate degree program;
234 (B) A technical college diploma program; or
235 (C) At least two technical college certificate of credit programs in one specific career
236 pathway.
237 (g)(j) A student who meets the requirements of subsections (f) subsection (h) of this Code
238 section shall be deemed to have met all graduation requirements of the State Board of
239 Education and shall not be subject to any assessments otherwise required for purposes of
240 graduation.
241 (h)(k) The state board, in consultation with the State Board of Education, Department of
242 Education, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Corrections, and the
243 Office of Planning and Budget, shall establish rules and regulations to implement the
244 provisions of this article.
245 20-2-141.1.
246 (a) By January 1, 2026, the State Board of Education, in collaboration with the state board,
247 the Office of Planning and Budget, and the Office of Student Achievement, shall establish
248 whatever policies, rules, and regulations are necessary to implement the requirements of
249 this article, including, but not limited to, any such policies, rules, or regulations that are
250 necessary to accurately account for each student who is participating in the program
251 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (f) of Code Section 20-4-141 in the counts required
252 by Code Section 20-2-160.
H. B. 217
- 10 -

25 HB 217/AP
253 (b) For each eligible student enrolled in the program on or after July 1, 2026, the State
254 Board of Education shall pay to the state board an amount not less than a proportional share
255 of QBE formula earnings, QBE grants, and federal funds earned by the resident school
256 system for such eligible student. Such proportional share shall be calculated pro rata based
257 on the number of one-sixth segments of the school day such eligible student attends at a
258 participating unit of the technical college system.
259 (c)(1) By April 1, 2026, and by April 1 each year thereafter, the state board and the State
260 Board of Education shall publish on the public website of the technical college system
261 a comprehensive list of courses at participating units of the technical college system that
262 shall be counted towards high school diploma requirements and shall be considered a
263 one-sixth segment of the school day for the purposes of this article. Once such a
264 comprehensive list is published on the public website of the technical college system, it
265 may only be revised upon written agreement by the state board and the State Board of
266 Education detailing the reasons for each revision. In the event such comprehensive list
267 is revised pursuant to such a written agreement, the comprehensive list published on the
268 public website of the technical college system shall be updated immediately along with
269 a copy of such written agreement.
270 (2) Each revision to the comprehensive list required by paragraph (1) of this subsection
271 shall be prospective, and no revision to such comprehensive list shall result in any
272 adverse action for any student enrolled and in good standing at the time of such revision.
273 (d) Beginning July 1, 2026, each resident school system with an eligible student who is
274 participating in the program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (f) of Code Section
275 20-4-141 shall enter into a participation agreement with the state board agreeing that each
276 such student:
277 (1) Is enrolled in the resident school system and resident school for administrative
278 purposes and for the purposes of education accountability assessment programs provided
279 for in Article 2 of Chapter 14 of this title only; and
H. B. 217
- 11 -

25 HB 217/AP
280 (2) Shall not be eligible to participate in extracurricular activities or interscholastic
281 activities under the sponsorship, direction, or control of such student's resident school or
282 resident school system.
283 20-4-142.
284 This article shall stand repealed on July 1, 2026 2031."
285 SECTION 4.
286 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 217
- 12 -